Indiana, session 2026, HB1364.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-42-5.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 5.7. Food: Labeling Requirements
Sec. 1. (a) This chapter applies to a food product label:
(1) printed; or
(2) copyrighted;
after June 30, 2027.
(b) This chapter does not apply to any of the following offered
for sale in Indiana by a food manufacturer:
(1) A product that contains an ingredient not intended for
human consumption.
(2) Food labeled, prepared, served, or sold in the following:
(A) A food establishment.
(B) A retail establishment.
(3) A product regulated by the federal Department of
Agriculture Food Safety and Inspection Service.
2026 IN 1364—LS 6580/DI 147


(4) A product labeled with a warning from the Surgeon
General of the federal Public Health Service.
(5) A drug.
(6) A dietary supplement.
(7) A pesticide chemical, soil, plant nutrient, or other raw
agricultural commodity.
Sec. 2. (a) If the federal Food and Drug Administration requires
an ingredient to be named on a food product label and the food
manufacturer offers the food product for sale in Indiana, the food
manufacturer shall ensure that each food product intended for
human consumption includes a warning label that discloses the use
of any of the following ingredients in the food product:
Acetylated esters of mono- and diglycerides (acetic acid ester).
Anisole.
Azodicarbonamide (ADA).
Butylated hydroxyanisole (BHA).
Butylated hydroxytoluene (BHT).
Bleached flour.
Blue 1 (CAS 3844-45-9).
Blue 2 (CAS 860-22-0).
Bromated flour.
Calcium bromate.
Canthaxanthin.
Certified food colors by the United States federal Food
and Drug Administration.
Citrus red 2 (CAS 6358-53-8).
Diacetyl.
Diacetyl tartaric and fatty acid esters of mono-
and diglycerides (DATEM).
Dimethylamylamine (DMAA).
Dioctyl sodium sulfosuccinate (DSS).
Ficin.
Green 3 (CAS 2353-45-9).
Interesterified palm oil.
Interesterified soybean oil.
Lactylated fatty acid esters of glycerol and propylene glycol.
Lye.
Morpholine.
Olestra.
Partially hydrogenated oil (PHO).
Potassium aluminum sulfate.
Potassium bromate.
2026 IN 1364—LS 6580/DI 147


Potassium iodate.
Propylene oxide.
Propylparaben.
Red 3 (CAS 16423-68-0).
Red 4 (CAS 4548-53-2).
Red 40 (CAS 25956-17-6).
Sodium aluminum sulfate.
Sodium lauryl sulfate.
Sodium stearyl fumarate.
Stearyl tartrate.
Synthetic trans fatty acid.
Thiodipropionic acid.
Titanium dioxide.
Toluene.
Yellow 5 (CAS 1934-21-0).
Yellow 6 (CAS 2783-94-0).
(b) The warning label required under subsection (a) must meet
the following requirements:
(1) Include the following statement:
"WARNING: This product contains an ingredient that is
not recommended for human consumption by the
appropriate authority in Australia, Canada, the European
Union, or the United Kingdom.".
(2) Be printed in a font size not smaller than the smallest font
size used to disclose other consumer information required by
the federal Food and Drug Administration.
(3) Contains sufficiently high contrast font to ensure the
statement described in subdivision (1) is likely to be seen and
understood by the intended consumer.
Sec. 3. If a food manufacturer or retailer offers a food product
described in section 2 of this chapter for sale in Indiana on the
manufacturer's or retailer's website, the food manufacturer or the
retailer shall disclose to the consumer all labeling information
required under section 2 of this chapter by either:
(1) posting a legible statement on the website on which the
product is offered for sale; or
(2) communicating the information to the consumer in some
other manner.
Sec. 4. If a food manufacturer violates this chapter, the attorney
general may bring an action to obtain any of the following against
the food manufacturer:
(1) Injunctive relief.
2026 IN 1364—LS 6580/DI 147


(2) A civil penalty of not more than fifty thousand dollars
($50,000) per day for each violation.
(3) The attorney general's reasonable costs of:
(A) the investigation of the violation; and
(B) maintaining the action.
(4) Other appropriate relief.
Sec. 5. A violation of this chapter does not create a private cause
of action.
2026 IN 1364—LS 6580/DI 147